Indiana, session 2026, HB1118.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 3-8-1-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.240-2025,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) This section does not apply to a candidate
for federal office.
(b) As used in this section, "felony" means a conviction for which
the convicted person might have been imprisoned for more than one (1)
year.
(c) A person is not disqualified under this section for:
(1) a felony conviction for which the person has been pardoned;
(2) a felony conviction that has been:
(A) reversed;
(B) vacated;
(C) set aside;
(D) not entered because the trial court did not accept the
person's guilty plea; or
(E) expunged under IC 35-38-9 (before its repeal) or
IC 35-38-9.5; or
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


(3) a person's plea of guilty or nolo contendere at a guilty plea
hearing that is not accepted and entered by a trial court.
(d) A person is disqualified from assuming or being a candidate for
an elected office if:
(1) the person gave or offered a bribe, threat, or reward to procure
the person's election, as provided in Article 2, Section 6 of the
Constitution of the State of Indiana;
(2) the person does not comply with IC 5-8-3 because of a
conviction for a violation of the federal laws listed in that statute;
(3) in a:
(A) jury trial, a jury publicly announces a verdict against the
person for a felony;
(B) bench trial, the court publicly announces a verdict against
the person for a felony; or
(C) guilty plea hearing, the person pleads guilty or nolo
contendere to a felony;
(4) the person has been removed from the office the candidate
seeks under Article 7, Section 11 or Article 7, Section 13 of the
Constitution of the State of Indiana;
(5) the person is a member of the United States armed forces on
active duty and prohibited by the United States Department of
Defense from being a candidate;
(6) the person is subject to:
(A) 5 U.S.C. 1502 (the Little Hatch Act); or
(B) 5 U.S.C. 7321-7326 (the Hatch Act);
and would violate either federal statute by becoming or remaining
the candidate of a political party for nomination or election to an
elected office or a political party office;
(7) the person is a nonjudicial court employee who would violate
Rule 4.6 of the Indiana Code of Judicial Conduct by being the
candidate of a political party for nomination or election to an
elected office or a political party office; or
(8) the person is a full-time employee of the department of
homeland security prohibited from participating in political
activities under IC 10-14-3-26.
(e) The subsequent reduction of a felony to a Class A misdemeanor
under IC 35 after the:
(1) jury has announced its verdict against the person for a felony;
(2) court has announced its verdict against the person for a felony;
or
(3) person has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to a felony;
does not affect the operation of subsection (d).
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


SECTION 2. IC 7.1-2-1-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.285-2019,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. To be eligible for appointment as a
commissioner, a person shall possess the following qualifications:
(1) The person must be at least thirty-one (31) years of age.
(2) The person may not have a conviction within ten (10) years
before the date of appointment of:
(A) a federal crime having a sentence of at least one (1) year;
(B) an Indiana Class A, Class B, or Class C felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 1, Level 2, Level 3,
Level 4, or Level 5 felony (for a crime committed after June
30, 2014); or
(C) a crime in a state other than Indiana having a penalty equal
to the penalty for an Indiana Class A, Class B, or Class C
felony (for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level
1, Level 2, Level 3, Level 4, or Level 5 felony (for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014).
However, this subdivision does not apply to a conviction that has
been expunged under IC 35-38-9 (before its repeal) or
IC 35-38-9.5.
(3) The person must be an Indiana resident for at least ten (10)
years immediately preceding the person's appointment.
SECTION 3. IC 7.1-2-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.285-2019,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. An appointed member of a local board shall
possess the following qualifications:
(1) The person must be at least twenty-one (21) years of age.
(2) The person must be a bona fide resident of the county in
which the person is to serve for at least five (5) years immediately
preceding the person's appointment.
(3) The person may not have a conviction within ten (10) years
before the date of appointment of:
(A) a federal crime having a sentence of at least one (1) year;
(B) an Indiana Class A, Class B, or Class C felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 1, Level 2, Level 3,
Level 4, or Level 5 felony (for a crime committed after June
30, 2014); or
(C) a crime in a state other than Indiana having a penalty equal
to the penalty for an Indiana Class A, Class B, or Class C
felony (for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level
1, Level 2, Level 3, Level 4, or Level 5 felony (for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014).
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


However, this subdivision does not apply to a conviction that has
been expunged under IC 35-38-9 (before its repeal) or
IC 35-38-9.5.
SECTION 4. IC 7.1-2-4-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.285-2019,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The designated member of a local board
shall meet the following requirements:
(1) The person must be an Indiana resident.
(2) The person must be familiar with Indiana alcoholic beverage
law.
(3) The person may not have a conviction within ten (10) years
before the date of appointment of:
(A) a federal crime having a sentence of at least one (1) year;
(B) an Indiana Class A, Class B, or Class C felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 1, Level 2, Level 3,
Level 4, or Level 5 felony (for a crime committed after June
30, 2014); or
(C) a crime in a state other than Indiana having a penalty equal
to the penalty for an Indiana Class A, Class B, or Class C
felony (for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level
1, Level 2, Level 3, Level 4, or Level 5 felony (for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014).
However, this subdivision does not apply to a conviction that has
been expunged under IC 35-38-9 (before its repeal) or
IC 35-38-9.5.
(b) The designated member may be an officer or employee of the
commission.
SECTION 5. IC 7.1-3-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.163-2025,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The commission shall not issue a beer
retailer's permit, except as otherwise authorized in this title and subject
to the other restrictions contained in this title, to the following persons:
(1) A person who does not have lawful status (as defined in
IC 9-13-2-92.3).
(2) A person who is not of good repute in the community in which
the person resides.
(3) A person who has been convicted within ten (10) years before
the date of application of:
(A) a federal crime having a sentence of at least one (1) year;
(B) an Indiana Class A, Class B, or Class C felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 1, Level 2, Level 3,
Level 4, or Level 5 felony (for a crime committed after June
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


30, 2014); or
(C) a crime in a state other than Indiana having a penalty equal
to the penalty for an Indiana Class A, Class B, or Class C
felony (for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level
1, Level 2, Level 3, Level 4, or Level 5 felony (for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014).
However, this subdivision does not apply to a conviction that has
been expunged under IC 35-38-9 (before its repeal) or
IC 35-38-9.5.
(4) A person who does not own the premises to which the permit
will be applicable, or who does not have a bona fide lease on the
premises for the full period for which the permit is to be issued.
(5) A law enforcement officer or an officer who is not an elected
officer of a municipal corporation, or governmental subdivision,
or of Indiana, charged with any duty or function in the
enforcement of this title.
(6) An officer or employee of a person engaged in the alcoholic
beverage traffic, which person is a nonresident of Indiana, or is
engaged in carrying on any phase of the manufacture of, traffic in,
or transportation of alcoholic beverages without a permit under
this title when a permit is required by this title.
(7) If the permit applicant does not hold a brewer's permit, a
person who leases from a person, or an officer or agent of that
person, who holds a brewer's permit or a beer wholesaler's permit.
(8) If the permit applicant does not hold a brewer's permit, a
person who is indebted to a person who holds a brewer's permit
or a beer wholesaler's permit, or an officer or agent of that person,
for a debt secured by a lien, mortgage, or otherwise, upon the
premises for which the beer retailer's permit is to be applicable,
or upon any of the property or fixtures on the premises, or used,
or to be used in connection with the premises.
(9) A person whose place of business is conducted by a manager
or agent, unless the manager or agent possesses the same
qualifications required for the issuance of a beer retailer's permit
to the person.
(10) A minor.
(11) A person non compos mentis.
(12) A person who has held a permit under this title and who has
had that permit revoked within one (1) year prior to the date of
application for a beer retailer's permit.
(13) A person who has made an application for a permit of any
type which has been denied less than one (1) year prior to the
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


person's application for a beer retailer's permit unless the first
application was denied by reason of a procedural or technical
defect.
(14) A person who is not the proprietor of a restaurant located and
being operated on the premises described in the application for
the beer retailer's permit, or of a hotel, or of a club, owning, or
leasing the premises as a part of it. The disqualification contained
in this subdivision shall not apply to the qualifications for or
affect the privileges to be accorded under a beer dealer's permit
or a dining car beer permit.
(b) Subsection (a)(10) does not prevent a minor from being a
stockholder in a corporation.
SECTION 6. IC 7.1-3-18.5-2.4, AS ADDED BY P.L.107-2024,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.4. (a) Subject to available resources, the
commission shall not issue a tobacco sales certificate, except as
otherwise authorized in this title and subject to the other restrictions
contained in this title, to the following persons:
(1) A person who does not have lawful status (as defined in
IC 9-13-2-92.3).
(2) A person who has been convicted within five (5) years before
the date of application of:
(A) a federal crime having a sentence of at least one (1) year;
(B) a Level 1, Level 2, Level 3, Level 4, or Level 5 felony; or
(C) a crime in a state other than Indiana having a penalty equal
to the penalty for an Indiana Level 1, Level 2, Level 3, Level
4, or Level 5 felony.
However, this subdivision does not apply to a conviction that has
been expunged under IC 35-38-9 (before its repeal) or
IC 35-38-9.5.
(3) A person who does not meet at least one (1) of the following
descriptions:
(A) The person owns the premises to which the certificate will
be applicable.
(B) The person has a valid lease on the premises:
(i) at the time of the application for a certificate; and
(ii) for the duration of the period in which the person sells or
distributes in the manner described in section 1 of this
chapter.
(C) The person has a franchise agreement with a franchisor:
(i) that owns the premises to which the certificate will be
applicable; or
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


(ii) that has a bona fide lease on the premises for the full
period for which the certificate is to be issued.
(4) A person whose place of business is conducted by a manager
or agent, unless the manager or agent possesses the same
qualifications required for the issuance of a tobacco sales
certificate to the person.
(5) A minor.
(6) A person non compos mentis.
(7) A person who has held a permit or certificate under this title
and who has had that permit or certificate revoked within one (1)
year prior to the date of application for a tobacco sales certificate.
(8) A person who has made an application for a permit or
certificate of any type under this title which has been denied less
than one (1) year prior to the person's application for a tobacco
sales certificate unless the first application was denied by reason
of a procedural or technical defect.
(b) Subsection (a)(5) does not prevent a minor from being a
stockholder in a corporation.
SECTION 7. IC 7.1-3-22-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.172-2021,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) This section applies to any permit that is
subject to the quota provisions of this chapter unless the permit is
obtained by sale, assignment, or transfer under IC 7.1-3-24 and a
permit described in IC 7.1-3-20-16(j).
(b) Whenever a permit to which this chapter applies becomes
available, the commission shall offer an opportunity to bid for that
permit to all persons who are qualified to receive that permit and who
have indicated a desire to obtain that permit. The commission shall
receive bids at an auction that it conducts. The highest bidder at the
commission's auction who is qualified to receive the permit in all
respects, including a determination by the local board that the person:
(1) does not have a conviction described in IC 7.1-3-4-2(a)(3) that
has not been expunged under IC 35-38-9 (before its repeal) or
IC 35-38-9.5; and
(2) is of good repute in the community in which that person
resides;
is entitled to receive the permit. This bidder shall pay the amount of the
bid at the time the permit is issued as a special fee for initial issuance
of the permit.
(c) The special fee for initial issuance of a permit that is prescribed
by this section is in addition to any other fees imposed by this title.
(d) All fee revenues collected under this section are subject to
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


IC 7.1-4-7-4.
(e) Thirty (30) days before a local board holds a hearing concerning
an applicant for a permit described in IC 7.1-3-20-16(j), the
commission shall provide notice of the hearing to the:
(1) city or town council; and
(2) mayor's office;
of the city or town in which the municipal lakefront development
project is located.
(f) The commission shall post signs indicating when and where a
hearing described in subsection (e) will take place.
(g) The commission shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement
this section.
SECTION 8. IC 22-2-17-4, AS ADDED BY P.L.210-2017,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) Criminal history information for an
employee or a former employee may not be introduced as evidence
against an employer, an employer's agents, or an employer's employees
in a civil action that is based on the conduct of the employee or the
former employee if:
(1) the nature of the criminal history information of the employee
or former employee does not bear a direct relationship to the facts
underlying the civil action;
(2) before the acts giving rise to the civil action occurred:
(A) a court order sealed the record of the criminal case;
(B) the criminal conviction has been reversed or vacated;
(C) the employee or former employee received a pardon for
the criminal conviction; or
(D) the criminal conviction has been expunged under
IC 35-38-9 (before its repeal) or IC 35-38-9.5; or
(3) the criminal history information concerns an arrest or a charge
that did not result in a criminal conviction.
(b) This section does not supersede any federal or state law
requirement to:
(1) conduct a criminal history information background
investigation; or
(2) consider criminal history information in hiring for particular
types of employment.
SECTION 9. IC 31-39-8.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 8.5. Expungement of Juvenile Arrest Records
Sec. 1. (a) This chapter applies to an expungement petition filed
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


after June 30, 2026.
(b) This section applies only to a child who has been arrested or
alleged to be a delinquent child, if:
(1) the arrest or juvenile delinquency allegation:
(A) did not result in a juvenile adjudication, even if the
arrest or juvenile delinquency allegation resulted in an
adjudication for an infraction; or
(B) resulted in a juvenile adjudication that was expunged
or was later vacated; and
(2) the child is not currently participating in a pretrial
diversion program, unless the prosecuting attorney authorizes
the child to petition for an expungement under this section.
(c) This subsection applies to a child alleged to be a delinquent
child after June 30, 2022. If:
(1) a court dismisses all juvenile delinquency allegations;
filed and pending against a child;
(2) one (1) year has passed since juvenile delinquency
allegations were filed against a child, and:
(A) there is no disposition or order of waiver; and
(B) the state is not actively prosecuting the allegations; or
(3) in a juvenile proceeding the court finds all allegations not
true, or the juvenile's true finding is later vacated;
the court shall immediately order all records related to the juvenile
delinquency allegations expunged. An expungement order that is
issued based on nonprosecution under subdivision (2) goes into
effect immediately. An expungement order issued under
subdivision (1) or (3) may not go into effect earlier than sixty (60)
days from the date of the dismissal or not true finding. However,
upon motion by the prosecuting attorney, if the court finds that
specific facts exist in the particular case which justify a delay, the
court may delay implementation of an expungement order under
subdivision (1) or (3) for up to one (1) year from the date of the
dismissal, acquittal, or no true finding.
(d) This subsection applies to a child arrested after June 30,
2022. If:
(1) a child is arrested;
(2) one (1) year has elapsed since the date of the arrest; and
(3) no delinquency allegations are pending against the child;
the child may petition a judge exercising juvenile jurisdiction in the
county (or a designated judge, if applicable) for expungement,
setting forth these facts. Upon receipt of the petition, the judge
shall immediately order the expungement of all records related to
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


the arrest. Expungement under this subsection does not shorten the
statute of limitations. A prosecuting attorney may still file
delinquency allegations under this subsection.
(e) Not earlier than one (1) year after the date of arrest or
juvenile delinquency allegation (whichever is later), if the child was
not adjudicated a delinquent child, or the opinion vacating the
adjudication becomes final, the child may petition the court for
expungement of the records related to the arrest or juvenile
delinquency allegation. However, a child may petition the court for
expungement at an earlier time if the prosecuting attorney agrees
in writing to an earlier time.
(f) A petition for expungement of records must be verified and
filed in a circuit or superior court in the county where the juvenile
delinquency allegations were filed, or if no juvenile delinquency
allegations were filed, in the county where the arrest occurred. The
petition must set forth:
(1) the date of the arrest or juvenile delinquency allegation
and true finding (if applicable);
(2) the county in which the arrest occurred and the county in
which the juvenile delinquency allegations were filed, if
applicable;
(3) the law enforcement agency employing the arresting
officer, if known;
(4) the court in which the juvenile delinquency allegations
were filed, if applicable;
(5) any other known identifying information, such as:
(A) the name of the arresting officer;
(B) the case number or court cause number;
(C) any aliases or other names used by the petitioner;
(D) the petitioner's driver's license number; and
(E) a list of each delinquency allegation and its disposition,
if applicable;
(6) the date of the petitioner's birth; and
(7) the petitioner's Social Security number.
A child who files a petition under this section is not required to pay
a filing fee.
(g) The court shall serve a copy of the petition for expungement
on the prosecuting attorney.
(h) Upon receipt of a petition for expungement, the court:
(1) may summarily deny the petition if the petition does not
meet the requirements of this section, or if the statements
contained in the petition indicate that the petitioner is not
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


entitled to relief; and
(2) shall grant the petition unless:
(A) the conditions described in subsection (b) have not
been met; or
(B) delinquency allegations are pending against the child.
(i) Whenever the petition of a child under this section is granted,
or if an expungement order is issued without a petition under
subsection (c):
(1) no information concerning the arrest, juvenile delinquency
allegation, or vacated juvenile delinquency adjudication
(including information from a collateral action that identifies
the petitioner), may be placed or retained in any state central
repository for criminal history information or in any other
alphabetically arranged criminal history information system
maintained by a local, regional, or statewide law enforcement
agency;
(2) the clerk of the supreme court shall seal or redact any
records in the clerk's possession that relate to the arrest,
juvenile delinquency allegation, or vacated juvenile
delinquency adjudication; and
(3) the records of:
(A) the juvenile court;
(B) a court that conducted a collateral action;
(C) a court of appeals; and
(D) the supreme court;
concerning the child shall be redacted or permanently sealed
from public access.
(j) If the court issues an order granting a petition for
expungement under this section, or issues an order for
expungement without a petition under subsection (c), the order
must include the information described in subsection (f).
(k) If a child whose records are expunged brings an action that
might be defended with the contents of the expunged records, the
defendant is presumed to have a complete defense to the action. In
order for the plaintiff to recover, the plaintiff must show that the
contents of the expunged records would not exonerate the
defendant. The plaintiff may be required to state under oath
whether the plaintiff had records in the juvenile justice system and
whether those records were expunged. If the plaintiff denies the
existence of the records, the defendant may prove their existence
in any manner compatible with the law of evidence.
SECTION 10. IC 35-31.5-2-46.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.219-2019,
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 46.5. "Collateral action", for purposes of:
(1) IC 35-38-9 (before its repeal), has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-38-9-0.5 (before its repeal); and
(2) IC 35-38-9.5 and IC 35-38-9.6, has the meaning set forth
in IC 35-38-9.5-2.
SECTION 11. IC 35-31.5-2-78, AS AMENDED BY P.L.175-2022,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 78. "Crime of domestic violence", for purposes of
IC 5-2-6.1, IC 35-38-9 (before its repeal), IC 35-38-9.5,
IC 35-47-2-1.5, and IC 35-47-4-7, means an offense or the attempt to
commit an offense that:
(1) has as an element the:
(A) use of physical force; or
(B) threatened use of a deadly weapon; and
(2) is committed against a family or household member, as
defined in section 128 of this chapter.
SECTION 12. IC 35-31.5-2-121, AS AMENDED BY P.L.219-2019,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 121."Episode of criminal conduct", for purposes
of IC 35-38-9 (before its repeal), IC 35-38-9.5, and IC 35-50-1-2, has
the meaning set forth in IC 35-50-1-2(b).
SECTION 13. IC 35-38-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Sealing and Expunging Conviction Records).
SECTION 14. IC 35-38-9.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 9.5. Expungement and Sealing of Conviction Records
Sec. 1. (a) This chapter applies to an expungement petition filed
after June 30, 2026.
(b) This chapter does not apply to:
(1) a person who has been convicted of:
(A) two (2) or more unrelated felonies involving the
unlawful use of a deadly weapon;
(B) an offense described in:
(i) IC 35-42-1 (homicide), including attempted murder
under IC 35-42-1-1;
(ii) IC 35-42-3.5 (human trafficking); or
(iii) IC 35-42-4 (sex offenses);
(C) a felony that resulted in the death of another person;
(D) official misconduct, if the person was an elected official
or judicial officer at the time the offense was committed;
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


(E) unlawful possession of a firearm by a serious violent
felon (IC 35-47-4-5); or
(F) in accordance with IC 1-1-2-4, an attempt or
conspiracy to commit an offense described in this
subdivision; or
(2) a person who is or has been required to register as a sex or
violent offender (as defined in IC 11-8-8-5) in any jurisdiction.
(c) A court may not order the bureau of motor vehicles to seal,
restrict access to, or otherwise expunge a conviction (as defined in
49 CFR 383.5) under this chapter for a person:
(1) who held a commercial driver's license or commercial
learner's permit under IC 9-24-6.1 at the time of the offense;
and
(2) whose conviction is for a violation described in 49 CFR
384.226.
(d) This chapter does not apply to a person seeking the
expungement of an arrest record under IC 35-38-9.6.
(e) This chapter does not apply to a person seeking the
expungement of a juvenile record. Juvenile records may be
expunged under IC 31-39-8.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "collateral action" means an
action or proceeding, including an administrative proceeding, that
is factually or legally related to an arrest, a criminal charge, or a
conviction. The term includes a proceeding or action concerning a
seizure, a civil forfeiture, and a petition for specialized driving
privileges.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "conviction records" means all
records relating to or created in connection with a conviction,
including a collateral action.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, a "Level 6 felony" includes:
(1) a Class D felony (for an offense committed before July 1,
2014); and
(2) an Indiana offense punishable by an indeterminate
sentence under a law other than IC 35-50, if the offense is a
Level 6 felony at the time the person files the petition for
expungement.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "misdemeanor" includes:
(1) a Class D felony (for a crime committed before July 1,
2014) or a Level 6 felony (for a crime committed after June
30, 2014), that is reduced to a misdemeanor pursuant to
IC 35-38-1-1.5 or IC 35-50-2-7; and
(2) an Indiana offense punishable by an indeterminate
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


sentence under a law other than IC 35-50, if the offense is a
misdemeanor at the time the person files the petition for
expungement.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "moderate felony" means a
felony that is:
(1) not a Level 6 felony; and
(2) otherwise expungeable under this chapter.
The term includes an Indiana offense punishable by an
indeterminate sentence under a law other than IC 35-50, if at the
time the person files the petition for expungement, the offense is
not a misdemeanor or Level 6 felony, and is expungeable under this
chapter.
Sec. 7. (a) This section applies only to a person convicted of a
misdemeanor.
(b) Not earlier than the later of:
(1) five (5) years after the date of conviction; or
(2) five (5) years after completion of the sentence;
(unless the prosecuting attorney consents in writing to an earlier
period), a person convicted of a misdemeanor may petition a court
to expunge all conviction records that relate to the misdemeanor
conviction.
Sec. 8. (a) This section applies only to a person convicted of a
Level 6 felony.
(b) Not earlier than the later of:
(1) eight (8) years after the date of conviction; or
(2) five (5) years after completion of the sentence;
(unless the prosecuting attorney consents in writing to an earlier
period), a person convicted of a Level 6 felony may petition a court
to expunge all conviction records that relate to the Level 6 felony
conviction.
Sec. 9. (a) This section applies only to a person convicted of a
moderate felony.
(b) Not earlier than the later of:
(1) ten (10) years after the date of conviction; or
(2) five (5) years after completion of the sentence;
(unless the prosecuting attorney consents in writing to an earlier
period), a person convicted of a moderate felony may petition a
court to expunge all conviction records that relate to the moderate
felony conviction.
Sec. 10. (a) A person who files a petition to expunge conviction
records shall file the petition in a circuit or superior court in the
county of conviction.
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


(b) If a court has previously granted a person's expungement
petition, the person may not file a petition to expunge any
conviction that was entered after the date the person filed the
previous petition to expunge (or the earliest previous petition to
expunge, if the person has filed more than one (1) previous petition
to expunge).
Sec. 11. If the court, after conducting a hearing, finds by a
preponderance of the evidence that:
(1) the appropriate waiting period required by this chapter
has elapsed;
(2) no charges are pending against the person;
(3) the person has paid all fines, fees, and court costs and
satisfied any restitution obligation placed on the person as
part of the sentence; and
(4) the person was not convicted of a crime during the waiting
period required by this chapter;
the court shall order any misdemeanor or Level 6 felony
convictions expunged and may order any moderate felony
convictions marked as expunged.
Sec. 12. (a) This section applies only to an order granting the
expungement of a misdemeanor or Level 6 felony.
(b) The court shall do the following with respect to the specific
records expunged by the court:
(1) Order:
(A) the department of correction;
(B) the bureau of motor vehicles; and
(C) each:
(i) law enforcement agency; and
(ii) other person;
who incarcerated, prosecuted, provided treatment for, or
provided other services for the person under an order of
the court;
to prohibit the release of the person's records or information
in the person's records to anyone without a court order, other
than a law enforcement officer acting in the course of the law
enforcement officer's official duty.
(2) Order the central repository for criminal history
information maintained by the state police department to seal
the person's expunged conviction records, including
information related to:
(A) an arrest or offense:
(i) in which no conviction was entered; and
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


(ii) that was committed as part of the same episode of
criminal conduct as the case ordered expunged; and
(B) any other references to any matters related to the case
ordered expunged, including in a collateral action.
This subdivision does not require the state police department
to seal any record the state police department does not have
legal authority to seal.
(3) Records sealed under subdivision (2) may be disclosed only
to:
(A) a prosecuting attorney, if needed to carry out the
official duties of the prosecuting attorney;
(B) a defense attorney, if needed to carry out the
professional duties of the defense attorney;
(C) a probation department, if:
(i) authorized by a court order; and
(ii) necessary to prepare a presentence report;
(D) the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the
Department of Homeland Security, if disclosure is required
to comply with an agreement relating to the sharing of
criminal history information;
(E) the:
(i) supreme court;
(ii) members of the state board of law examiners;
(iii) executive director of the state board of law
examiners; and
(iv) employees of the state board of law examiners, in
accordance with rules adopted by the state board of law
examiners;
for the purpose of determining whether an applicant
possesses the necessary good moral character for
admission to the bar;
(F) a person required to access expunged records to
comply with the Secure and Fair Enforcement for
Mortgage Licensing Act (12 U.S.C. 5101 et seq.) or
regulations adopted under the Secure and Fair
Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act;
(G) the bureau of motor vehicles, the Federal Motor
Carrier Administration, and the Commercial Driver's
License Information System (CDLIS), if disclosure is
required to comply with federal law relating to reporting
a conviction for a violation of a traffic control law;
(H) a school (as defined in IC 22-4-2-37), for the purpose of
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


determining whether to:
(i) employ a person seeking employment, including
volunteer employment, with the school;
(ii) continue a person's employment, including volunteer
employment at the school; or
(iii) grant access or admission to the school to an
applicant contractor or a contractor;
if the person, contractor, or applicant contractor is likely
to have contact with a student enrolled in the school,
regardless of the age of the student; and
(I) the state police department, if disclosure is required for
the purpose of expunging or marking as expunged records
in the central repository for criminal history information.
(4) Notify the clerk of the supreme court to seal any records
in the clerk's possession that relate to the conviction,
including any records concerning a collateral action.
A probation department may provide an unredacted version of a
presentence report disclosed under subdivision (3)(C) to any
person authorized by law to receive a presentence report.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d), the records of:
(1) the sentencing court;
(2) a court that conducted a collateral action;
(3) a juvenile court;
(4) a court of appeals; and
(5) the supreme court;
concerning the person shall be permanently sealed. However, a
petition for expungement granted under this section does not affect
an existing or pending driver's license suspension.
(d) If a petition to expunge conviction records is granted under
this section with respect to the records of a person who is named as
an appellant or an appellee in an opinion or memorandum decision
by the supreme court or the court of appeals, or who is identified
in a collateral action, the court shall:
(1) redact the opinion or memorandum decision as it appears
on the computer gateway administered by the office of
technology so that it does not include the petitioner's name (in
the same manner that opinions involving juveniles are
redacted); and
(2) provide a redacted copy of the opinion to any publisher or
organization to whom the opinion or memorandum decision
is provided after the date of the order of expungement.
The supreme court and court of appeals are not required to
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


destroy or otherwise dispose of any existing copy of an opinion or
memorandum decision that includes the petitioner's name.
(e) Notwithstanding subsection (c), a prosecuting attorney may
submit a written application to a court that granted an
expungement petition to gain access to any records that were
permanently sealed under subsection (c), if the records are relevant
in a new prosecution of the person. If a prosecuting attorney who
submits a written application under this subsection shows that the
records are relevant for a new prosecution of the person, the court
that granted the expungement petition shall:
(1) order the records to be unsealed; and
(2) allow the prosecuting attorney who submitted the written
application to have access to the records.
If a court orders records to be unsealed under this subsection, the
court shall order the records to be permanently resealed at the
earliest possible time after the reasons for unsealing the records
cease to exist. However, if the records are admitted as evidence
against the person in a new prosecution that results in the person's
conviction, or are used to enhance a sentence imposed on the
person in a new prosecution, the court is not required to reseal the
records.
(f) If a person whose conviction records are expunged is
required to register as a sex offender based on the commission of
an offense which has been expunged:
(1) the expungement does not affect the operation of the sex
offender registry website, any person's ability to access the
person's records, records required to be maintained
concerning sex or violent offenders, or any registration
requirement imposed on the person; and
(2) the expunged conviction records must be clearly marked
as expunged on the sex offender registry website.
(g) Expungement of a crime of domestic violence under section
7 of this chapter does not restore a person's right to possess a
firearm. The right of a person convicted of a crime of domestic
violence to possess a firearm may be restored only in accordance
with IC 35-47-4-7.
(h) The court shall order any related records described in
IC 35-38-9.6-1(i) sealed or redacted in the manner described in
IC 35-38-9.6-1, unless the records described in IC 35-38-9.6-1(i)
have been ordered sealed and redacted under this section.
(i) The court shall include in its order the information described
in section 14(b) of this chapter.
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


(j) If the court issues an order granting a petition for
expungement under this chapter, the court shall include in its order
the information described in section 17(c) of this chapter.
Sec. 13. (a) This section applies only to an order granting the
expungement of a moderate felony conviction.
(b) The court records and other public records relating to the
arrest, conviction, or sentence of a person whose conviction records
have been marked as expunged remain public records. However,
the court shall order that the records be clearly and visibly marked
or identified as being expunged. A petition for expungement
granted under this section does not affect an existing or pending
driver's license suspension.
(c) The state police department, the bureau of motor vehicles,
and any other law enforcement agency in possession of records that
relate to the conviction, including any records concerning a
collateral action, ordered to be marked as expunged shall add an
entry to the person's record of arrest, conviction, or sentence in the
criminal history data base stating that the record is marked as
expunged. Nothing in this chapter prevents the bureau of motor
vehicles from reporting information about a conviction for a
violation of a traffic control law to the Commercial Driver's
License Information System (CDLIS) in accordance with federal
law.
(d) If the court issues an order granting a petition for
expungement under this section, the court shall include in its order
the information described in section 14(b) of this chapter.
(e) If a court issues an order granting a petition for
expungement under this section, the court shall also order any
related records described in IC 35-38-9.6-1(i) marked as expunged,
unless the records described in IC 35-38-9.6-1(i) have been ordered
marked as expunged under this section.
(f) A person whose records have been ordered marked as
expunged under this section is considered to have had the person's
records expunged for all purposes other than the disposition of the
records.
Sec. 14. (a) This section applies only to a petition to expunge
conviction records under this chapter.
(b) Any person may seek an expungement under this chapter by
filing a verified petition for expungement. The petition must
include the following:
(1) The petitioner's full name and all other legal names or
aliases by which the petitioner is or has been known.
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


(2) The petitioner's date of birth.
(3) The petitioner's addresses from the date of the offense to
the date of the petition.
(4) The case number or court cause number, if available.
(5) The petitioner shall affirm that no criminal investigation
or charges are pending against the petitioner.
(6) The petitioner shall affirm that the petitioner has not
committed another felony or misdemeanor within the period
required for expungement.
(7) The petitioner shall list all convictions, all collateral
actions, the cause number of each conviction, if known, the
date of the conviction, and any appeals from the conviction
and the date any appellate opinion was handed down, if
applicable.
(8) The petitioner shall include:
(A) the petitioner's Social Security number;
(B) the petitioner's driver's license number;
(C) the date of the petitioner's arrest, if applicable; and
(D) the date on which the petitioner was convicted.
(9) The petitioner shall affirm that the required period has
elapsed or attach a copy of the prosecuting attorney's written
consent to a shorter period.
(10) The petitioner shall describe any other petitions that the
petitioner has filed under this chapter.
(c) The petitioner may include any other information that the
petitioner believes may assist the court.
(d) A person who files a petition under this section is required
to pay the filing fee required in civil cases. The court may reduce
or waive this fee if the person is indigent.
(e) The petitioner shall serve a copy of the petition upon the
prosecuting attorney in accordance with the Indiana Rules of Trial
Procedure.
(f) The prosecuting attorney shall inform the victim of the
victim's rights under IC 35-40-6 by contacting the victim at the
victim's last known address. However, if a court has no discretion
in granting an expungement petition under this chapter, the
prosecuting attorney is not required to inform the victim of the
victim's rights under this subsection.
(g) The prosecuting attorney shall reply to the petition not later
than thirty (30) days after receipt. If the prosecuting attorney fails
to timely reply to the petition:
(1) the prosecuting attorney has waived any objection to the
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


petition; and
(2) the court shall proceed to consider the petition under
section 15 of this chapter.
Sec. 15. (a) If the prosecuting attorney does not object, or has
waived objection to the petition under section 14 of this chapter,
the court may grant the petition for expungement without a
hearing.
(b) The court may summarily deny a petition, if the petition
does not meet the requirements of section 14 of this chapter, or if
the statements contained in the petition demonstrate that the
petitioner is not entitled to relief.
(c) If the prosecuting attorney objects to the petition, the
prosecuting attorney shall file the reasons for objecting to the
petition with the court and serve a copy of the objections on the
petitioner at the time the prosecuting attorney objects to the
petition. The court shall set the matter for hearing not sooner than
sixty (60) days after service of the petition on the prosecuting
attorney.
(d) A victim of the offense for which expungement is sought may
submit an oral or written statement in support of or in opposition
to the petition at the time of the hearing.
(e) The petitioner must prove by a preponderance of the
evidence that the facts alleged in the verified petition are true.
(f) The grant or denial of a petition is an appealable final order.
(g) If the court grants the petition for expungement, the court
shall issue an order of expungement as described in sections 12 and
13 of this chapter.
(h) The order granting the petition for expungement described
in sections 12 and 13 of this chapter must include the information
described in section 14(b) of this chapter.
(i) A petitioner may seek to expunge more than one (1)
conviction at the same time. The petitioner shall consolidate all
convictions that the petitioner wishes to expunge from the same
county in one (1) petition. A petitioner who wishes to expunge
convictions from separate counties must file a petition in each
county in which a conviction was entered.
(j) A petitioner whose petition for expungement has been denied,
in whole or in part, may refile that petition for expungement, in
whole or in part, with respect to one (1) or more convictions
included in the initial expungement petition that were not
expunged. However, if the petition was denied due to the court's
exercise of its discretion concerning the expungement of a
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


moderate felony conviction, a petition for expungement may be
refiled only after the elapse of three (3) years from the date on
which the previous expungement petition was denied.
(k) If:
(1) the information required to be expunged, marked as
expunged, or otherwise sealed or restricted under this chapter
changes as the result of an amendment to this chapter; and
(2) a person whose petition for expungement was granted
before the effective date of the amendment wishes to obtain
the benefits of that amendment;
the person may file a petition for a supplemental order of
expungement with the court that granted the petition for
expungement. A petition for a supplemental order of expungement
must include a copy of the expungement order, succinctly set forth
the relief the petitioner seeks, and include any other information
required by the court. If the court finds that the person was
granted an order for expungement before the effective date of the
amendment of this chapter and is otherwise entitled to relief, the
court shall issue a supplemental order for expungement consistent
with the amendment.
Sec. 16. (a) This section applies to a collateral action adjudicated
or conducted in a county other than the county in which a court
granted an expungement.
(b) Upon receipt of a request to expunge records related to a
collateral action and a properly certified expungement order, a
circuit or superior court in the county in which the collateral
action occurred shall:
(1) notify the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the
court is located of the request to expunge records related to a
collateral action and set the matter for hearing; or
(2) if it conclusively appears from the court's records that the
person is entitled to expungement as described in subsection
(c), order the records expunged without a hearing.
(c) The circuit or superior court in the county in which the
collateral action was adjudicated or conducted shall order records
of the collateral action expunged (for an expungement granted
under section 12 of this chapter or under IC 35-38-9.6) or marked
as expunged (for an expungement granted under section 13 of this
chapter), unless the court finds that the collateral action does not
relate to the expunged arrest or conviction.
(d) A request to expunge records of a collateral action may be
made at any time after the original expungement order is issued.
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


(e) A request to expunge records shall be filed under the cause
number of the collateral action, if applicable. A person who
requests expungement of records of a collateral action under this
section is not required to pay a filing fee, even if the request is filed
under a new cause of action.
Sec. 17. (a) This section does not apply to a person to whom
sealed records may be disclosed under this chapter. With respect
to a person seeking employment with a law enforcement agency or
a probation or community corrections department, including
volunteer employment, subsections (b), (d), (e), and (f) do not apply
to the law enforcement agency or the probation or community
corrections department.
(b) It is unlawful discrimination for any person to:
(1) suspend;
(2) expel;
(3) refuse to employ;
(4) refuse to admit;
(5) refuse to grant or renew a license, permit, or certificate
necessary to engage in any activity, occupation, or profession;
or
(6) otherwise discriminate against;
any person because of a conviction or arrest record expunged or
sealed under this chapter.
(c) Except as provided in section 12(g) of this chapter, the civil
rights of a person whose conviction has been expunged shall be
fully restored, including the right to vote, to hold public office, to
be a proper person under IC 35-47-1-7(2), and to serve as a juror.
(d) In any application for employment, a license, or other right
or privilege, a person may be questioned about a previous criminal
record only in terms that exclude expunged convictions or arrests,
such as: "Have you ever been arrested for or convicted of a crime
that has not been expunged by a court?".
(e) A person whose record is expunged shall be treated as if the
person had never been convicted of the offense. However, upon a
subsequent arrest or conviction for an unrelated offense, the prior
expunged conviction:
(1) may be considered by the court in determining the
sentence imposed for the new offense;
(2) is a prior unrelated conviction for purposes of:
(A) a habitual offender enhancement; and
(B) enhancing the new offense based on a prior conviction;
and
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


(3) may be admitted as evidence in the proceeding for a new
offense as if the conviction had not been expunged.
(f) Any person that discriminates against a person as described
in subsection (b) commits a Class C infraction and may be held in
contempt by the court issuing the order of expungement or by any
other court of general jurisdiction. Any person may file a written
motion of contempt to bring an alleged violation of this section to
the attention of a court. In addition, the person is entitled to
injunctive relief.
(g) In any judicial or administrative proceeding alleging
negligence or other fault, an order of expungement may be
introduced as evidence of the person's exercise of due care in
hiring, retaining, licensing, certifying, admitting to a school or
program, or otherwise transacting business or engaging in activity
with the person to whom the order of expungement was issued.
(h) A conviction, including any records relating to the conviction
and any records concerning a collateral action, that has been
expunged under this chapter is not admissible as evidence in an
action for negligent hiring, admission, or licensure against a person
or entity who relied on the order.
Sec. 18. An expungement case, and all documents filed in the
case, becomes confidential when the court issues an expungement
order. However, until the court issues an expungement order,
documents filed in the case are not confidential, and any hearing
held in the case shall be open.
Sec. 19. (a) A person may not waive the right to expungement
under this chapter as part of a plea agreement. Any purported
waiver of the right to expungement in a plea agreement is invalid
and unenforceable as against public policy.
(b) This section does not prohibit the finding of a waiver of the
right to expungement based on a failure to comply with the
provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 20. A criminal history provider (as defined in IC 24-4-18-2)
that provides a criminal history report containing an expunged
conviction is subject to the penalties described in IC 24-4-18-8.
SECTION 15. IC 35-38-9.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 9.6. Expungement of Arrest Records
Sec. 1. (a) This chapter applies to an expungement petition filed
after June 30, 2026.
(b) This section applies only to a person who has been arrested
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


or charged with an offense if:
(1) the arrest or criminal charge:
(A) did not result in a conviction, even if the arrest or
criminal charge resulted in an adjudication for an
infraction; or
(B) resulted in a conviction and the conviction was
expunged under IC 35-38-9.5 or was later vacated; and
(2) the person is not currently participating in a pretrial
diversion program, unless the prosecuting attorney authorizes
the person to petition for an expungement under this section.
(c) This subsection applies to a person charged with an offense
after June 30, 2022. If:
(1) a court dismisses all criminal charges filed and pending
against a person; and
(2) in a criminal trial a defendant is acquitted of all charges,
or the defendant's conviction is later vacated;
the court shall immediately order all records related to the
criminal charges expunged. However, an expungement order
issued under this subsection may not go into effect earlier than
sixty (60) days from the date of the dismissal or acquittal.
However, upon motion by the prosecuting attorney, if the court
finds that specific facts exist in the particular case which justify a
delay, the court may delay implementation of an expungement
order under this subsection for up to one (1) year from the date of
the dismissal or acquittal.
(d) This subsection applies to a person arrested after June 30,
2022. If:
(1) a person is arrested;
(2) one (1) year has elapsed since the date of the arrest; and
(3) no charges are pending against the person;
the person may petition a judge exercising criminal jurisdiction in
the county (or a designated judge, if applicable) for expungement,
setting forth these facts. Upon receipt of the petition, the judge
shall immediately order the expungement of all records related to
the arrest. Expungement under this subsection does not shorten the
statute of limitations. A prosecuting attorney may still file a charge
under this subsection.
(e) Not earlier than one (1) year after the date of arrest or
criminal charge (whichever is later), if the person was not
convicted, or the opinion vacating the conviction becomes final, the
person may petition the court for expungement of the records
related to the arrest or criminal charge. However, a person may
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


petition the court for expungement at an earlier time if the
prosecuting attorney agrees in writing to an earlier time.
(f) A petition for expungement of records must be verified and
filed in a circuit or superior court in the county where the criminal
charges were filed, or if no criminal charges were filed, in the
county where the arrest occurred. The petition must set forth:
(1) the date of the arrest, criminal charges, and conviction (if
applicable);
(2) the county in which the arrest occurred and the county in
which the information or indictment was filed, if applicable;
(3) the law enforcement agency employing the arresting
officer, if known;
(4) the court in which the criminal charges were filed, if
applicable;
(5) any other known identifying information, such as:
(A) the name of the arresting officer;
(B) the case number or court cause number;
(C) any aliases or other names used by the petitioner;
(D) the petitioner's driver's license number; and
(E) a list of each criminal charge and its disposition, if
applicable;
(6) the date of the petitioner's birth; and
(7) the petitioner's Social Security number.
A person who files a petition under this section is not required to
pay a filing fee.
(g) The court shall serve a copy of the petition for expungement
on the prosecuting attorney.
(h) Upon receipt of a petition for expungement, the court:
(1) may summarily deny the petition if the petition does not
meet the requirements of this section, or if the statements
contained in the petition indicate that the petitioner is not
entitled to relief; and
(2) shall grant the petition unless:
(A) the conditions described in subsection (b) have not
been met; or
(B) criminal charges are pending against the person.
(i) Whenever the petition of a person under this section is
granted, or if an expungement order is issued without a petition
under subsection (c):
(1) no information concerning the arrest, criminal charges, or
vacated conviction (including information from a collateral
action that identifies the petitioner), may be placed or
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


retained in any state central repository for criminal history
information or in any other alphabetically arranged criminal
history information system maintained by a local, regional, or
statewide law enforcement agency;
(2) the clerk of the supreme court shall seal or redact any
records in the clerk's possession that relate to the arrest,
criminal charges, or vacated conviction;
(3) the records of:
(A) the sentencing court;
(B) a court that conducted a collateral action;
(C) a court of appeals; and
(D) the supreme court;
concerning the person shall be redacted or permanently
sealed from public access; and
(4) with respect to the records of a person who is named as an
appellant or an appellee in an opinion or memorandum
decision by the supreme court or the court of appeals, or who
is identified in a collateral action, the court shall:
(A) redact the opinion or memorandum decision as it
appears on the computer gateway administered by the
office of technology so that it does not include the
petitioner's name (in the same manner that opinions
involving juveniles are redacted); and
(B) provide a redacted copy of the opinion to any publisher
or organization to whom the opinion or memorandum
decision is provided after the date of the order of
expungement.
The supreme court and the court of appeals are not required
to redact, destroy, or otherwise dispose of any existing copy of
an opinion or memorandum decision that includes the
petitioner's name.
(j) If the court issues an order granting a petition for
expungement under this section, or issues an order for
expungement without a petition under subsection (c), the order
must include the information described in subsection (f).
(k) If a person whose records are expunged brings an action that
might be defended with the contents of the expunged records, the
defendant is presumed to have a complete defense to the action. In
order for the plaintiff to recover, the plaintiff must show that the
contents of the expunged records would not exonerate the
defendant. The plaintiff may be required to state under oath
whether the plaintiff had records in the criminal justice system and
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


whether those records were expunged. If the plaintiff denies the
existence of the records, the defendant may prove their existence
in any manner compatible with the law of evidence.
(l) Records expunged or sealed under this section must be
removed or sealed in accordance with this section, but may not be
deleted or destroyed. Records expunged or sealed under this
section remain available to the court and criminal justice agencies
as needed to carry out their official duties.
SECTION 16. IC 35-47-4-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.181-2014,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Notwithstanding IC 35-47-2, IC 35-47-2.5,
the restoration of the right to serve on a jury under IC 33-28-5-18, the
restoration of the right to vote under IC 3-7-13-5, or the expungement
of a crime of domestic violence under IC 35-38-9 (before its repeal)
or IC 35-38-9.5, and except as provided in subsections (b), (c), and (f),
a person who has been convicted of a crime of domestic violence may
not possess a firearm.
(b) Not earlier than five (5) years after the date of conviction, a
person who has been convicted of a crime of domestic violence may
petition the court for restoration of the person's right to possess a
firearm. In determining whether to restore the person's right to possess
a firearm, the court shall consider the following factors:
(1) Whether the person has been subject to:
(A) a protective order;
(B) a no contact order;
(C) a workplace violence restraining order; or
(D) any other court order that prohibits the person from
possessing a firearm.
(2) Whether the person has successfully completed a substance
abuse program, if applicable.
(3) Whether the person has successfully completed a parenting
class, if applicable.
(4) Whether the person still presents a threat to the victim of the
crime.
(5) Whether there is any other reason why the person should not
possess a firearm, including whether the person failed to satisfy
a specified condition under subsection (c) or whether the person
has committed a subsequent offense.
(c) The court may condition the restoration of a person's right to
possess a firearm upon the person's satisfaction of specified conditions.
(d) If the court denies a petition for restoration of the right to
possess a firearm, the person may not file a second or subsequent
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


petition until one (1) year has elapsed after the filing of the most recent
petition.
(e) A person has not been convicted of a crime of domestic violence
for purposes of subsection (a) if the person has been pardoned.
(f) The right to possess a firearm shall be restored to a person whose
conviction is reversed on appeal or on postconviction review at the
earlier of the following:
(1) At the time the prosecuting attorney states on the record that
the charges that gave rise to the conviction will not be refiled.
(2) Ninety (90) days after the final disposition of the appeal or the
postconviction proceeding.
SECTION 17. IC 35-50-2-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.168-2014,
SECTION 116, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) A person who commits a
Class C felony (for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) shall be
imprisoned for a fixed term of between two (2) and eight (8) years, with
the advisory sentence being four (4) years. In addition, the person may
be fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).
(b) A person who commits a Level 5 felony (for a crime committed
after June 30, 2014) shall be imprisoned for a fixed term of between
one (1) and six (6) years, with the advisory sentence being three (3)
years. In addition, the person may be fined not more than ten thousand
dollars ($10,000).
(c) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), if a person commits
nonsupport of a child as a Class C felony (for a crime committed before
July 1, 2014) or a Level 5 felony (for a crime committed after June 30,
2014) under IC 35-46-1-5, the sentencing court may convert the Class
C felony conviction to a Class D felony conviction or a Level 5 felony
conviction to a Level 6 felony conviction if, after receiving a verified
petition as described in subsection (d) and after conducting a hearing
in which the prosecuting attorney has been notified, the court makes
the following findings:
(1) The person has successfully completed probation as required
by the person's sentence.
(2) The person has satisfied other obligations imposed on the
person as required by the person's sentence.
(3) The person has paid in full all child support arrearages due
that are named in the information and no further child support
arrearage is due.
(4) The person has not been convicted of another felony since the
person was sentenced for the underlying nonsupport of a child
felony.
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


(5) There are no criminal charges pending against the person.
(d) A petition filed under subsection (c) must be verified and set
forth the following:
(1) A statement that the person was convicted of nonsupport of a
child under IC 35-46-1-5.
(2) The date of the conviction.
(3) The date the person completed the person's sentence.
(4) The amount of the child support arrearage due at the time of
conviction.
(5) The date the child support arrearage was paid in full.
(6) A verified statement that no further child support arrearage is
due.
(7) Any other obligations imposed on the person as part of the
person's sentence.
(8) The date the obligations were satisfied.
(9) A verified statement that there are no criminal charges
pending against the person.
(e) A person whose conviction has been converted to a lower
penalty under this section is eligible to seek expungement under:
(1) IC 35-38-9-3 (before its repeal), with the date of conversion
used as the date of conviction to calculate time frames under
IC 35-38-9 (before its repeal); or
(2) IC 35-38-9.5-8, with the date of conversion used as the date
of conviction to calculate time frames under IC 35-38-9.5.
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Courts and Criminal Code, to
which was referred House Bill 1118, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the House with
the recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Page 12, delete line 41.
Page 13, delete line 2, begin a new line double block indented and
insert:
"(E) unlawful possession of a firearm by a serious violent
felon (IC 35-47-4-5); or
(F) in accordance with IC 1-1-2-4, an attempt or
conspiracy to commit an offense described in this
subdivision; or".
Page 14, delete lines 12 through 16, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"(b) Not earlier than the later of:
(1) five (5) years after the date of conviction; or
(2) five (5) years after completion of the sentence;
(unless the prosecuting attorney consents in writing to an earlier
period), a person convicted of a misdemeanor may petition a court
to expunge all conviction records that relate to the misdemeanor
conviction.".
Page 14, delete lines 19 through 23, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"(b) Not earlier than the later of:
(1) eight (8) years after the date of conviction; or
(2) five (5) years after completion of the sentence;
(unless the prosecuting attorney consents in writing to an earlier
period), a person convicted of a Level 6 felony may petition a court
to expunge all conviction records that relate to the Level 6 felony
conviction.".
Page 14, delete lines 26 through 30, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"(b) Not earlier than the later of:
(1) ten (10) years after the date of conviction; or
(2) five (5) years after completion of the sentence;
(unless the prosecuting attorney consents in writing to an earlier
period), a person convicted of a moderate felony may petition a
court to expunge all conviction records that relate to the moderate
felony conviction.".
Page 15, delete lines 6 through 13, begin a new line block indented
and insert:
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106


"(4) the person was not convicted of a crime during the
waiting period required by this chapter;".
Page 16, delete lines 7 through 14, begin a new line double block
indented and insert:
"(A) a prosecuting attorney, if needed to carry out the
official duties of the prosecuting attorney;
(B) a defense attorney, if needed to carry out the
professional duties of the defense attorney;".
Page 21, delete lines 20 through 24, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"(d) A victim of the offense for which expungement is sought
may submit an oral or written statement in support of or in
opposition to the petition at the time of the hearing.
(e) The petitioner must prove by a preponderance of the
evidence that the facts alleged in the verified petition are true.".
Page 21, line 25, delete "(e)" and insert "(f)".
Page 21, line 26, delete "(f)" and insert "(g)".
Page 21, line 29, delete "(g)" and insert "(h)".
Page 21, line 32, delete "(h)" and insert "(i)".
Page 21, line 38, delete "(i)" and insert "(j)".
Page 22, line 5, delete "(j)" and insert "(k)".
Page 24, delete lines 22 through 26, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"Sec. 18. An expungement case, and all documents filed in the
case, becomes confidential when the court issues an expungement
order. However, until the court issues an expungement order,
documents filed in the case are not confidential, and any hearing
held in the case shall be open.".
Page 24, line 27, delete "Sec. 18." and insert "Sec. 19.".
Page 24, line 34, delete "Sec. 19." and insert "Sec. 20.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1118 as introduced.)
MCNAMARA
Committee Vote: yeas 12, nays 1.
HB 1118—LS 6489/DI 106